Utah statutes.
16-6a-1704.   Saving provisions.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the repeal of any statute by
this act does not affect:
(i)  the operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its
repeal;
(ii)  any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability
acquired, accrued, or incurred under the statute before its repeal;
(iii)  any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment
incurred because of the violation of the statute before its repeal; or
(iv)  any proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution commenced under the
statute before its repeal.
(b)  A proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution described in Subsection
(1)(a)(iv) may be completed in accordance with the repealed statute as if the
statute had not been repealed.
(2)  If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by
this act is reduced by this act, the penalty or punishment if not already
imposed shall be imposed in accordance with this act.
(3)  Section 16-6a-707 does not operate to permit a nonprofit corporation in
existence prior to April 30, 2001, to take action by the written consent of
fewer than all of the members entitled to vote with respect to the subject
matter of the action, until the date a resolution providing otherwise is
approved either:
(a)  by a consent in writing:
(i)  setting forth the proposed resolution; and
(ii)  signed by all of the members entitled to vote with respect to the
subject matter of the resolution; or
(b)  at a duly convened meeting of members, by the vote of the same percentage
of members of each voting group as would be required to include the resolution
in an amendment to the nonprofit corporation's articles of incorporation.
(4)  Indemnification for an act or omission of a director or officer of a
nonprofit corporation if the act or omission occurs prior to April 30, 2001,
is governed by Title 16, Chapter 6, Utah Nonprofit Corporation and Co-
operative Association Act, in effect as of April 29, 2001.
(5)  A nonprofit corporation is not required to amend the nonprofit
corporation's articles of incorporation to state whether its members are
voting members if:
(a)  the nonprofit corporation was:
(i)  formed prior to April 30, 2001;
(ii)  formed under the laws of this state; and
(iii)  existing on April 30, 2001; and
(b)  the articles of incorporation of the nonprofit corporation states on
April 30, 2001, that the nonprofit corporation has members.
